Missouri, session 2026, HB3038.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 192, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 192.2515, to read as follows:
192.2515. 1. There is hereby established in the department of health and senior
services a special office, to be known as the "Office of Special Investigations", to assist in
the investigation of reports of abuse, neglect, and exploitation of "eligible adults",
defined in this section as having the same meaning given to the term in section 192.2400.
The office of special investigations shall:
(1) Upon the request of a local, county, state, or federal law enforcement agency;
a county, state, or federal prosecutor; or division of senior and disability services staff,
investigate or assist in the investigation of abuse, neglect, or exploitation of an eligible
adult. Before initiating an investigation or execution of any search warrant, the office of
special investigations shall notify the chief law enforcement officer of the appropriate
jurisdiction; and
(2) Upon request of law enforcement, coordinate with and provide assistance,
expertise, or training to law enforcement agencies and multidisciplinary teams for the
investigation and prosecution of eligible adult abuse, neglect, and exploitation.
2. Investigators for the office of special investigations who are licensed as peace
officers by the director of the department of public safety under chapter 590 shall be
deemed peace officers within the state of Missouri while acting in an investigation or on
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3038 2
behalf of an eligible adult. The power of arrest of an investigator for the office of special
investigations acting as a peace officer shall be limited to offenses involving eligible adult
abuse, neglect, or exploitation and to situations of imminent danger to the investigator
or another person.
3. The director of the department of health and senior services or his or her
designee shall have the power to subpoena the production of books, papers, or records
when necessary to investigate the potential abuse, neglect, or exploitation of an eligible
adult.
4. All reports and records made and maintained by the office of special
investigations or local law enforcement relating to criminal investigations conducted
under this section, including arrests, shall be available in the same manner as law
enforcement records as set forth in sections 610.100 to 610.210. All other records shall
be available in the same manner as provided for in sections 192.2435, 192.2500, and
192.2505.
✔